District of Columbia statutes.
6-1037

Dissolution of Commission.

The Commission shall cease to exist 90 days after the final report required by § 6-1033 is submitted to the Mayor, the Chairman of the Council, the chairperson of the Council Committee on Economic Development, and the Director.

Oct. 1, 2002, D.C. Law 14-190, § 1147, 49 DCR 6968